Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1635
Complaints of violations; filed; procedure.

Any person claiming damage or loss as a result of any act or practice by a private postsecondary career school or its agent, or both, which is a violation of the Private Postsecondary Career School Act or of the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act may file with the board a verified complaint against such school or against its agent or both. The complaint shall set forth the alleged violation and shall contain such other information as may be required by the board. A complaint may also be filed with the board by the commissioner or the Attorney General.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 35;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 35;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2835;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 35.